California statutes. Water Code
(c) The county or counties in which the district is located, and a map or plat indicating the boundaries established for the district as required by Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 54900) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

If the order declaring the district formed contains all of the information required to be in the certificate, the county clerk may cause a copy of the order to be filed in lieu of the certificate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 829, Sec. 59.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

30322.

The district shall have been duly incorporated upon the filing of the certificate or a copy of the order declaring the district formed with the county assessor and the State Board of Equalization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 829, Sec. 60.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

30323.

From and after the date of the filing with the county assessor and the State Board of Equalization, the district named in the filing is incorporated as a county water district with all the rights, privileges, and powers set forth in this division and necessarily incident to this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 829, Sec. 61.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

30324.

No informality in any proceeding, including informality in the conduct of any election, not substantially affecting adversely the legal rights of any citizen shall invalidate the incorporation of any county water district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

30325.

Any proceeding wherein the validity of the incorporation of a district is denied shall be commenced within three months from the date of the certificate of incorporation; otherwise the incorporation and legal existence of the district and all proceedings in respect thereto shall be incontestable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3. INTERNAL ORGANIZATION [30500. - 30586.]



  CHAPTER 1. Officers and Employees Generally [30500. - 30547.]



  ARTICLE 1. Directors [30500. - 30516.]

30500.

Each district shall have a board of five directors each of whom, whether elected or appointed, shall be a voter of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

30500.1.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 30500, the local agency formation commission, in approving either a consolidation of districts or the reorganization of two or more districts into a single county water district may, pursuant to subdivisions (k) and (n) of Section 56886 of the Government Code, increase the number of directors to serve on the board of directors of the consolidated or reorganized district to 7, 9, or 11, who shall be members of the board of directors of the districts to be consolidated or reorganized as of the effective date of the consolidation or reorganization.

(b) Upon the expiration of the terms of the members of the board of directors of the consolidated district, or a district reorganized as described in subdivision (a), whose terms first expire following the effective date of the consolidation or reorganization, the total number of members on the board of directors shall be reduced until the number equals the number of members permitted by the principal act of the consolidated or reorganized district, or any larger number as may be specified by the local agency formation commission in approving the consolidation or reorganization.

(c) In addition to the powers granted under Section 1780 of the Government Code, in the event of a vacancy on the board of directors of the consolidated district or a district reorganized as described in subdivision (a) at which time the total number of directors is greater than five, the board of directors may, by majority vote of the remaining members of the board, choose not to fill the vacancy. In that event, the total membership of the board of directors shall be reduced by one board member. Upon making the determination not to fill a vacancy, the board of directors shall notify the board of supervisors of its decision.

(d) For the purposes of this section: “consolidation” means consolidation, as defined in Section 56030 of the Government Code; “district” or “special district” means district or special district, as defined in Section 56036 of the Government Code; and “reorganization” means reorganization, as defined in Section 56073 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 172, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

30500.3.

Notwithstanding Section 30500, the Board of Directors of the Sawyers Bar County Water District shall adopt a resolution ordering the reduction in the number of directors from five to three if, at least 85 days before a general district election, the board receives a petition that requests that reduction and a majority of the voters in the district has signed that petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 176, Sec. 54.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

30501.

The directors first elected upon the formation of the district shall hold office pursuant to Section 10505 of the Elections Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 235.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

30502.

The term of office of each director other than directors first elected or directors appointed to fill an unexpired term shall be four years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1565.)
-------------------------------------------

30503.

If a person elected fails to qualify, the office shall be filled as if there were a vacancy in the office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

30504.

All vacancies occurring in the office of director shall be filled pursuant to Section 1780 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1059.)
-------------------------------------------

30506.

Each director elected or appointed shall hold office until his successor qualifies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

30507.

Each director shall receive compensation in an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) per day for each day’s attendance at meetings of the board or for each day’s service rendered as a director by request of the board, not exceeding a total of six days in any calendar month, together with any expenses incurred in the performance of his or her duties required or authorized by the board. For purposes of this section, the determination of whether a director’s activities on any specific day are compensable shall be made pursuant to Article 2.3 (commencing with Section 53232) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code. Reimbursement for these expenses is subject to Sections 53232.2 and 53232.3 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 700, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

30507.1.

Each director of the Contra Costa Water District shall receive compensation in an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) per day for each day’s attendance at meetings of the board and for each day’s service rendered as a director by request of the board, not exceeding a total of 10 days in any calendar month, together with any expenses incurred in the performance of duties required or authorized by the board. For purposes of this section, the determination of whether a director’s activities on any specific day are compensable shall be made pursuant to Article 2.3 (commencing with Section 53232) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code. Reimbursement for these expenses is subject to Sections 53232.2 and 53232.3 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 700, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

30508.

If a director’s place of residence, as defined in Section 244 of the Government Code, is moved outside district boundaries or outside the boundaries of that director’s division where elected from a division, and if within 180 days of the move or of the effective date of this section the director fails to reestablish a place of residence within the district or within the director’s division, it shall be presumed that a permanent change of residence has occurred and that a vacancy exists on the board of directors pursuant to Section 1770 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 571, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

30509.

Before entering upon the duties of his office each director shall take and subscribe the official oath and file it with the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

30510.

The oath of office may be taken before the secretary, any member of the board of directors, or any officer authorized by law to administer oaths.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

30511.

In a county water district formed to include all or part of Pleasant Valley, Ventura County, each member of the board of directors, whether elected or appointed, shall be either a voter of the district or an owner of land within the district.

The provisions of this section shall apply only to the board of directors of a county water district formed in all or part of Pleasant Valley, Ventura County. These special provisions are necessary for reasons similar to those expressed in Section 30205.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1287.)
-------------------------------------------

30513.

Notwithstanding Section 30500 or any other provision of this division, each member of the board of directors of the Canebrake County Water District in San Diego County, whether elected or appointed, shall be either a voter of the district or an owner of land within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 179.)
-------------------------------------------

30514.

If, on or before July 1, 1977, a district has assumed the responsibilities, rights, duties, assets, liabilities, and obligations of a sanitary district, the board may, and from time to time thereafter may, increase the number of directors to serve thereon to seven, nine or eleven. The additional directors shall be elected at the next general district election or at a special election called for that purpose. One-half of the additional directors shall hold office until the election and qualification of their successors at the first succeeding general district election, and the other one-half of the additional directors shall hold office until the election and qualification of their successors at the second succeeding general district election. The additional directors shall classify themselves by lot to determine their initial terms of office. Thereafter, they shall hold office for the term provided in Section 30502.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 939, Sec. 24.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative January 1, 1995, by Sec. 29 of Ch. 939.)
-------------------------------------------

30516.

(a) If the Orange County local agency formation commission orders the reorganization of the Capistrano Beach County Water District and the Capistrano Beach Sanitary District into a single district, the board of directors of the reorganized district shall, notwithstanding Section 30500 or any other provision of law, initially consist of 10 members, who shall be the combined boards of directors of the two districts as of the effective date of the reorganization.

(b) Upon the expiration of the terms of the members of the board of directors of the reorganized district whose terms first expire following the effective date of the reorganization, the total number of members on the board of directors shall be reduced to seven members. Upon the expiration of the succeeding terms of the members of the board of directors of the reorganized district, the total number of members of the board of directors shall be reduced to five members.

(c) In addition to the powers granted under Section 1780 of the Government Code, in the event of a vacancy on the board of directors of the reorganized district at which time the total number of directors is greater than five, the board of directors may, by majority vote of the remaining members of the board, choose not to fill the vacancy. In that event the total membership of the board of directors shall be reduced by one board member. Upon making the determination not to fill a vacancy, the board of directors shall notify the board of supervisors of its decision.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 939, Sec. 25.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative January 1, 1995, by Sec. 29 of Ch. 939.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. The Board [30520. - 30530.]

30520.

Within 30 days after the election of the first directors and thereafter within 30 days after taking office pursuant to Section 10554 of the Elections Code the directors shall meet and shall elect one of their number president and may elect one of their number vice president.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 236.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

30521.

The board shall:

(a) Provide for the time and place of holding its regular meetings.

(b) Provide for the manner of calling special meetings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

30522.

At its organization meeting the board may transact any business of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

30523.

The board shall act only by ordinance, resolution, or motion.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

30524.

A majority of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

30525.

No ordinance, resolution, or motion shall be passed or become effective without the affirmative votes of at least a majority of the members of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

30525.5.

A district may destroy a record pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 60200) of Division 1 of Title 6 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 158, Sec. 38.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

30526.

Except where action is taken by the unanimous vote of all directors present and voting, the ayes and noes shall be taken upon the passage of all ordinances, resolutions, or motions and entered upon the minutes of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

30527.

The enacting clause of all ordinances passed by the board shall be: “Be it ordained by the board of directors of __________ County Water District as follows:”

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

30528.

All ordinances shall be signed by the president and attested by the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

30529.

All legislative sessions of the board shall be public.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

30530.

The board shall establish rules for its proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Other Officers and Employees [30540. - 30547.]

30540.

(a) The board shall, at its first meeting or as soon thereafter as practicable, appoint by a majority vote a general manager and a secretary.

(b) The board shall also, by majority vote, do either of the following:

(1) Appoint an auditor or treasurer to carry out the duties required by Section 30582 and other duties required by the board.

(2) Retain an auditor as an independent contractor, other than the auditor or treasurer appointed pursuant to paragraph (1), to conduct an annual audit of the district’s books, records, and financial affairs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 906, Sec. 15.   Effective October 8, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 24 of Ch. 906.)
-------------------------------------------

30541.

A director shall not be the general manager, secretary, treasurer, or auditor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 454, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

30542.

The general manager, secretary, treasurer, and auditor shall each receive the compensation determined by the board and shall serve at its pleasure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 454, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

30543.

The same person may serve as general manager and secretary, secretary and auditor, or secretary and treasurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 454, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

30544.

The board may at any time appoint or employ and prescribe the authorities and duties of other officers, employees, attorneys, and engineers necessary or convenient for the business of the district, each of whom shall serve at the pleasure of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

30545.

The general manager, secretary, auditor, treasurer, and other employees or assistants of the district, as required by the board, shall each give a bond to the district conditioned for the faithful performance of his or her duties as the board may provide.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 454, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

30546.

Any regular employee of a district who is a deputy sheriff, or who has successfully completed the peace officer training course described in subdivision (a) of Section 832 of the Penal Code, and is designated by appropriate resolution of the board, has the authority to issue citations in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 5c (commencing with Section 853.5) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code for violations of laws of the state and ordinances of a city, a county, or the district, respecting trespass upon, damage to, interference with, or contamination of, any water, watercourse, land, structure, or facility owned, used, or controlled by the district for any purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 532, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

30547.

(a) A district may employ a suitable security force. The employees of the district that are designated by the general manager as security officers shall have the authority and powers conferred by Section 830.34 of the Penal Code upon peace officers. The district shall adhere to the standards for recruitment and training of peace officers established by the Commission on Peace Officers Standards and Training pursuant to Title 4 (commencing with Section 13500) of Part 4 of the Penal Code.

(b) Every security officer employed by a district shall conform to the standards for peace officers of the Commission on Peace Officers Standards and Training. Any officer who fails to conform to those standards shall not have the powers of a peace officer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 853, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Board and Officer Activities [30575. - 30586.]

30575.

The board is the governing body of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

30576.

The powers of districts enumerated in this division shall, except as therein otherwise provided, be exercised by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

30577.

Each member of the board, or the secretary, may administer oaths and affirmations in connection with the taking of testimony at any hearing, investigation, or other matter pending before the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

30578.

The president shall:

(a) Sign all contracts on behalf of the district.

(b) Perform other duties imposed by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

30579.

The secretary shall:

(a) Countersign all contracts on behalf of the district.

(b) Perform other duties imposed by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

30579.5.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (a) of Section 30578 and subdivision (a) of Section 30579, the board may alternatively authorize, subject to such limitations and conditions as it may determine, the execution of contracts on behalf of the district by another officer or officers of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 241.)
-------------------------------------------

30580.

The general manager shall:

(a) Have full charge and control of the maintenance, operation, and construction of the water works or water-works system of the district.

(b) Have full power and authority to employ and discharge all employees and assistants at pleasure.

(c) Prescribe the duties of employees and assistants.

(d) Fix and alter the compensation of employees and assistants subject to approval by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

30581.

The general manager shall also:

(a) Perform other duties imposed by the board.

(b) Report to the board in accordance with the rules and regulations as it adopts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

30582.

If the board appoints an auditor or treasurer pursuant to Section 30540, the auditor or treasurer shall install and maintain a system of auditing and accounting that shall completely and at all times show the financial condition of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 454, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

30586.

The board of a district in existence on the effective date of this section shall file a certificate with the Secretary of State on or before January 1, 1964, listing:

(a) The name of the district.

(b) The date of formation.

(c) The county or counties in which the district is located, and a description of the boundaries of the district, or reference to a map showing such boundaries, which map shall be attached to the certificate, or reference to the county recorder’s office where a description of such boundaries has been recorded.

If the order declaring the district formed contains all of the information required to be in the certificate, the board may file a copy of the order in lieu of the certificate. If the certificate filed with the Secretary of State stating that the formation of the district was approved by the voters contains all of the information required by this section, no further certificate need be filed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 457.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4. ELECTIONS [30700. - 30831.]



  CHAPTER 1. Elections Generally [30700. - 30700.6.]

30700.

The provisions of the Elections Code relating to the qualifications of electors, so far as they may be applicable, shall govern all water district elections except:

(a) To the extent that the provisions of the Elections Code pertaining to the qualification of voters at local elections are inconsistent with the provisions of that code pertaining to general elections, the provisions of the Elections Code pertaining to local elections shall control.

(b) This division shall control over any inconsistent provision of the Elections Code except the Uniform District Election Law (Part 4 (commencing with Section 10500) of Division 10 of the Elections Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 237.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

30700.5.

Notwithstanding Section 30021 or any other provision of the law, in the Pleasant Valley County Water District every owner of land within the district, but no others, may vote at the election for directors or otherwise. Such owners need not be residents of the district in order to qualify as voters. Each voter shall be entitled to cast one vote for each one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed valuation of land, exclusive of improvements, minerals, and mineral rights therein, to which he had title. The last equalized county assessment roll is conclusive evidence of ownership and of the value of the real property so owned. Upon request by the county clerk, the county assessor shall provide within 45 days a certified list of every owner of real property within the district and the assessed value of the land, exclusive of improvements, minerals, and mineral rights therein, owned by the voter in the district. Where the land is owned in joint tenancy, tenancy in common, or any other multiple ownership, the owners of such land shall designate in writing which one of the owners shall be deemed the owner of such land for purposes of qualifying as a voter.

The legal representative of a corporation or estate owning real property may vote on behalf of such corporation or estate. As used in this section, legal representative means an official of a corporation owning real property or a guardian, executor, or administrator of the estate of the holder of title to real property who:

(a) Is appointed under the laws of the state.

(b) Is entitled to possession of the estate in real property.

(c) Is authorized by the appointing court to exercise the particular right, privilege or immunity which he seeks to exercise. Before a legal representative votes at a district election he shall present to the precinct board a certified copy of his authority which shall be kept and filed with the returns of the election.

Every voter, or his legal representative may vote at any district election either in person or by a person duly appointed as his proxy, but shall be entitled to cast only one vote. The appointment of a proxy shall be as provided in Section 35005.

The provisions of this section shall apply only to a county water district heretofore formed in Pleasant Valley, Ventura County. These special provisions are necessary for reasons similar to those expressed in Section 30205.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 728.)
-------------------------------------------

30700.6.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 30021 or any other provision of the law, qualified voters at elections for directors or otherwise in the Sierra Lakes County Water District shall be (1) voters who are residents of the district, and (2) every owner of real property within the district, who is not a resident of the district.

(b) The last equalized county assessment roll shall be conclusive evidence of ownership of the real property so owned. Where land is owned in joint tenancy, tenancy in common, or any other multiple ownership, the owners of the land shall designate in writing which one of the owners shall be deemed the owner of the land for purposes of qualifying as a voter.

(c) The legal representative of a corporation or estate owning real property may vote on behalf of the corporation or estate. As used in this section, legal representative means an official of a corporation owning real property or a guardian, executor, or administrator of the estate of the holder of title to real property who:(1) Is appointed under the laws of this state.(2) Is entitled to the possession of the estate’s real property.(3) Is authorized by the appointing court to exercise the particular right, privilege, or immunity which he or she seeks to exercise.Before a legal representative votes at a district election, he or she shall present to the precinct board a certified copy of his or her authority which shall be kept and filed with the returns of the election.

(d) Every voter, or his or her legal representative, may vote at any district election either in person or by a person duly appointed as his or her proxy, but shall be entitled to cast only one vote. The appointment of a proxy shall be as provided in Section 35005. Elections shall be conducted pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 35106) of Chapter 2 of Part 4 of Division 13.

(e) This section shall not affect incumbent directors of the district, but in the event of a vacancy or upon the expiration of each present term, each director, upon taking office or commencing a new term, shall be a voter as defined in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1652, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Election of Directors [30730. - 30782.]



  ARTICLE 1. Creation of Divisions [30730. - 30735.]

30730.

The board may, if it deems it to be for the best interest of the district, by resolution submit to the voters at any district election the question whether the directors shall be elected by divisions or from divisions.

The term “by divisions,” as used in this article, means election of the directors by voters of the division alone. The term “from divisions,” as used in this article, means election of directors who are residents of the division from which they are elected by the voters of the entire district.

The board of any district which is electing directors by divisions on the effective date of the amendment of this section at the 1971 Regular Session of the Legislature shall determine by ordinance, subject to referendum as provided in Section 30831, whether directors shall be elected by divisions or from divisions. The board shall thereupon comply with the requirements of Section 30733 or Section 30734, whichever is applicable, in the same manner as if the question of whether the directors shall be elected by divisions or from divisions had been submitted to and approved by the voters of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 173.)
-------------------------------------------

30731.

If the question is submitted to the voters at a general district election, the notices required by Section 12112 of the Elections Code shall contain a statement of the question to appear on the ballot. If the question is submitted to the voters at any district election, other than a general district election, the notice of election and ballot shall contain a statement of the question.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 588, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

30733.

If the question submitted to the voters of the district pursuant to this article provides for the election of directors by divisions and is approved by a majority of the voters voting on the question, then:

(a) The board shall promptly by resolution divide the district into five divisions as nearly equal in population as practicable and assign a number to each division.

(b) The board shall, not less than 85 days prior to the general district election next after the election approving the election of directors by division, by resolution designate which divisions shall elect directors at that election to succeed the directors whose terms then expire. The remaining divisions shall elect directors at the general district election next following that election.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, subdivision (d) applies to districts in which directors are elected by divisions.

(d) The board of directors shall, by resolution, adjust the boundaries of any divisions pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 22000) of Division 21 of the Elections Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 435, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

30734.

If the question submitted to the voters of the district pursuant to this article provides for the election of directors from divisions and is approved by a majority of the voters voting on the question, then:

(a) The board shall promptly by resolution divide the district into five divisions as nearly equal in acreage as practicable and assign a number to each division.

(b) The board shall, not less than 85 days prior to the general district election next after the election approving the election of directors from divisions, by resolution designate the division from which directors shall be elected at that election to succeed directors whose terms then expire. Directors shall be elected from the remaining divisions at the general district election next following that election.

(c) The board may, at any time after initially dividing the district into divisions but not less than 85 days before a general district election, by resolution change the boundaries of the divisions to keep them as nearly as equal in size as practicable.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 173.)
-------------------------------------------

30735.

Directors elected by division shall be voters of the divisions by which they are elected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Preparation for Election [30773. - 30782.]

30773.

The provisions of this article shall apply only to the Pleasant Valley County Water District, heretofore formed in Pleasant Valley, Ventura County, and the Kings County Water District, heretofore formed in Kings County.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

30774.

All ballots printed shall be precisely on the same size, quality, tint of paper, kind of type, and color of ink so that without the number it would be impossible to distinguish one ballot from another.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

30775.

The names of all candidates printed upon the ballot shall be in type of the same size and style.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

30776.

A column may be provided on the right-hand side for questions permitted by this division to be voted upon at water district elections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

30777.

The order of candidates names on the ballot shall be as provided by the Elections Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1287.)
-------------------------------------------

30778.

The county elections official shall cause the ballots to be printed, bound, and numbered as provided in the Elections Code, except as otherwise required in this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 159.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

30779.

The ballots shall contain the list of names and the respective offices as published in the proclamation and shall be in substantially the following form:
General (or Special) Water District Election, ____ County Water District
(Inserting date thereof).

Instructions to Voters: To vote, stamp or write a cross (+) opposite the name of the candidate for whom you desire to vote. All marks
 otherwise made are forbidden. All distinguishing marks are forbidden and make the ballot void. If you wrongly mark, tear, or deface this ballot, return it to the inspector of elections and obtain another.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 328, Sec. 240.   (SB 1330)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

30780.

The ballot shall contain the following instruction: “For director vote for (giving number).”

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

30781.

A half-inch square shall be provided at the right of the name of each candidate wherein to mark the cross.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

30782.

Half-inch spaces shall be left below the printed names of candidates for each office, equal in number to the number of offices to be filled, wherein the voter may write the name of any person for whom he wishes to vote.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Initiative; Referendum; Recall [30830. - 30831.]

30830.

Ordinances may be passed by voters in accordance with Article 1 (commencing with Section 9100) of Chapter 2 of Division 9 of the Elections Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 239.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

30831.

Ordinances may be subject to referendum in accordance with Article 2 (commencing with Section 9140) of Chapter 2 of Division 9 of the Elections Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 240.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 5. POWERS AND PURPOSES [31000. - 31182.]



  CHAPTER 1. Powers and Purposes Generally [31000. - 31149.7.]



  ARTICLE 1. Powers Generally [31000. - 31016.]

31000.

County water districts shall be managed under the provisions of this division and may exercise the powers therein expressly granted or necessarily implied therefrom.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31001.

Each district has the power generally to perform all acts necessary to carry out fully the provisions of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31002.

A district has perpetual succession.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31003.

A district may adopt a seal and alter it at pleasure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31004.

A district may make contracts and employ labor to carry out the purposes of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31005.

A district may have construction or other work performed by contract or may do the work under its own superintendence.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31006.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any district formed under this division may, by resolution of the board of the district spread on its minutes, change the name of the district. That changed name need not include the word “county.”

Certified copies of the resolution changing the name of the district shall be recorded in the office of the county recorder of every county, included in whole or in part, in the district and sent to the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 829, Sec. 62.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

31007.

The rates and charges to be collected by the district shall be so fixed as to yield an amount sufficient to do each of the following:

(a) Pay the operating expenses of the district.

(b) Provide for repairs and depreciation of works owned or operated by the district.

(c) Pay the interest on any bonded debt.

(d) So far as possible, provide a fund for the payment of the principal of the bonded debt as it becomes due.

It is intended by this section to require the district to pay the interest and principal of its bonded debt from the revenues of the district, except that this requirement is not intended to apply to a bonded debt for sewage disposal purposes.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 31006 by Stats. 1953, Ch. 451.)
-------------------------------------------

31007.5.
